lt-LT: Sunkumų kilnojimo diržo stilius: Štangos spaudimo diržas; Atsispaudimų lygiagretėse diržas; Diržas su dviguba sagtimi; Hibridinis diržas; Diržas su svirtine sagtimi; Jėgos trikovės diržas; Greito fiksavimo diržas; Diržas su vienguba sagtimi; Siaurėjantis diržas; „Velcro“ diržas; Kita
pl: Styl pasa do podnoszenia ciężarów: Pas do wyciskania; Pas do pompek na poręczach; Pas z klamrą na dwa bolce; Pas hybrydowy; Pas z klamrą zatrzaskową; Pas trójbojowy; Pas z szybką blokadą; Pas z klamrą na jeden bolec; Pas zwężany; Pas na rzep; Inne
zh-TW: 舉重腰帶樣式: 臥推腰帶; 負重腰帶; 雙排扣腰帶; 混合型腰帶; 快扣腰帶; 健力腰帶; 快速鎖定腰帶; 單排扣腰帶; 漸窄腰帶; 魔鬼氈腰帶; 其他
sl-SI: Stil pasu za dvigovanje uteži: Pas za potisk s prsi; Pas za sklece na bradlji; Pas z dvojnim zatičem; Hibridni pas; Pas z zaponko na vzvod; Pas za powerlifting; Pas s hitrim zapenjanjem; Pas z enojnim zatičem; Zožen pas; Pas na ježka; Drugo
es: Estilo del cinturón de levantamiento de pesas: Cinturón de press de banca; Cinturón de lastre; Cinturón de doble púa; Cinturón híbrido; Cinturón de palanca; Cinturón de powerlifting; Cinturón de bloqueo rápido; Cinturón de una púa; Cinturón cónico; Cinturón de velcro; Otro
pt-BR: Cinto de levantamento de peso estilo: Cinto para supino; Cinto para paralelas; Cinto com fivela de dois pinos; Cinto híbrido; Cinto com alavanca; Cinto para powerlifting; Cinto de travamento rápido; Cinto com fivela de um pino; Cinto cônico; Cinto de velcro; Outro
vi: Đai nâng tạ kiểu dáng: Đai đẩy tạ nằm; Đai nhúng tạ; Đai khóa hai ngạnh; Đai lai; Đai khóa đòn bẩy; Đai cử tạ sức mạnh; Đai khóa nhanh; Đai khóa một ngạnh; Đai thon dần; Đai khóa dán; Khác
bg-BG: Стил на колан за вдигане на тежести: Колан за лежанка; Колан за кофички; Колан с два шипа; Хибриден колан; Колан с лост; Колан за пауърлифтинг; Колан с бързо заключване; Колан с един шип; Стесняващ се колан; Колан с велкро; Друго
tr: Halter kemeri stili: Bench kemeri; Dip kemeri; Çift tırnaklı kemer; Hibrit kemer; Manivelalı kemer; Powerlifting kemeri; Hızlı kilitlenen kemer; Tek tırnaklı kemer; Konik kemer; Cırt cırtlı kemer; Diğer
nl: Gewichthef riem stijl: Bankdrukriem; Dipriem; Riem met dubbele sluitpen; Hybride riem; Hefboomriem; Powerliftingriem; Snelsluitriem; Riem met enkele sluitpen; Taps toelopende riem; Klittenbandriem; Overig
nb: Vektløftingsbeltestil: Benkpressbelte; Dipsbelte; Belte med dobbel spenne; Hybridbelte; Lever-belte; Styrkeløftbelte; Hurtiglåsbelte; Belte med enkel spenne; Avsmalnende belte; Borrelåsbelte; Annet
ro-RO: Stilul centurii de haltere: Centură pentru împins din culcat; Centură pentru flotări la paralele; Centură cu cataramă dublă; Centură hibridă; Centură cu pârghie (lever); Centură pentru powerlifting; Centură cu închidere rapidă; Centură cu o singură cataramă; Centură conică; Centură cu Velcro; Altele
fr: Type de ceinture d’haltérophilie: Ceinture de développé couché; Ceinture de lest; Ceinture à double broche; Ceinture hybride; Ceinture à levier; Ceinture de powerlifting; Ceinture à verrouillage rapide; Ceinture à simple broche; Ceinture profilée; Ceinture en Velcro; Autre
zh-CN: 举重皮带款式: 卧推腰带; 负重腰带; 双排扣腰带; 混合腰带; 快扣腰带; 力量举腰带; 快锁腰带; 单排扣腰带; 锥形腰带; 魔术贴腰带; 其他
pt-PT: Estilo do cinto de levantamento de peso: Cinto de supino; Cinto de fundos; Cinto de duas pontas; Cinto híbrido; Cinto de alavanca; Cinto de powerlifting; Cinto de bloqueio rápido; Cinto de uma ponta; Cinto afunilado; Cinto de velcro; Outro
sv: Typ av tyngdlyftningsbälte: Bänkbälte; Dipsbälte; Bälte med dubbelstift; Hybridbälte; Hävstångsbälte; Styrkelyftsbälte; Bälte med snabblås; Bälte med enkelstift; Avsmalnande bälte; Kardborrebälte; Övrigt
ko: 역도 벨트 유형: 벤치 벨트; 딥 벨트; 더블 프롱 벨트; 하이브리드 벨트; 레버 벨트; 파워리프팅 벨트; 퀵 록킹 벨트; 싱글 프롱 벨트; 테이퍼드 벨트; 벨크로 벨트; 기타
cs: Styl vzpěračského opasku: Opasek na bench; Opasek na dipy; Opasek s dvojitou přezkou; Hybridní opasek; Opasek s pákovou přezkou; Powerlifterský opasek; Rychloupínací opasek; Opasek s jednoduchou přezkou; Zúžený opasek; Opasek na suchý zip; Jiný
hr-HR: Stil pojasa za dizanje utega: Pojas za bench; Pojas za propadanja; Pojas s dvostrukom kopčom; Hibridni pojas; Pojas s polugom; Pojas za powerlifting; Pojas za brzo zaključavanje; Pojas s jednostrukom kopčom; Suženi pojas; Pojas na čičak; Ostalo
ru: Стиль тяжелоатлетического пояса: Для жима лежа; Пояс для отягощений; С двухштырьковой пряжкой; Гибридный; С рычажной пряжкой; Для пауэрлифтинга; Быстрозажимной; С одноштырьковой пряжкой; Сужающийся; На липучке; Другое
th: สไตล์เข็มขัดยกน้ำหนัก: เข็มขัดยกน้ำหนักท่าเบนช์เพรส; เข็มขัดถ่วงน้ำหนัก; เข็มขัดหัวเข็มคู่; เข็มขัดไฮบริด; เข็มขัดหัวงัด; เข็มขัดพาวเวอร์ลิฟติ้ง; เข็มขัดล็อกเร็ว; เข็มขัดหัวเข็มเดี่ยว; เข็มขัดปลายสอบ; เข็มขัดตีนตุ๊กแก; อื่นๆ
de: Art des Gewichthebergürtels: Bankdrück-Gürtel; Dip-Gürtel; Doppel-Dornschließe; Hybridgürtel; Hebelverschluss; Powerlifting-Gürtel; Schnellverschluss-Gürtel; Einzel-Dornschließe; Taillierter Gürtel; Klettverschluss-Gürtel; Andere
en: Weightlifting belt style: Bench belt; Dip belt; Double prong belt; Hybrid belt; Lever belt; Powerlifting belt; Quick-locking belt; Single prong belt; Tapered belt; Velcro belt; Other
it: Stile della cintura da sollevamento pesi: Cintura da panca; Cintura per dip; Cintura a doppia fibbia; Cintura ibrida; Cintura a leva; Cintura da powerlifting; Cintura a sgancio rapido; Cintura a perno singolo; Cintura sagomata; Cintura in velcro; Altro
el: Στυλ ζώνης άρσης βαρών: Ζώνη πάγκου; Ζώνη βυθίσεων; Ζώνη με διπλή πόρπη; Υβριδική ζώνη; Ζώνη με μοχλό; Ζώνη δυναμικού τριάθλου; Ζώνη γρήγορης ασφάλισης; Ζώνη με μονή πόρπη; Κωνική ζώνη; Ζώνη Velcro; Άλλο
fi: Painonnostovyön tyyli: Penkkivyö; Dippivyö; Kaksipiikkinen vyö; Hybridivyö; Vipulukkovyö; Voimanostovyö; Pikalukkovyö; Yksipiikkinen vyö; Kapeneva vyö; Tarrakiinnitysvyö; Muu
sk-SK: Štýl opasku na vzpieranie: Opasok na bench press; Opasok so záťažou; Opasok s dvojitým tŕňom; Hybridný opasok; Pákový opasok; Trojbojársky opasok; Rýchloupínací opasok; Opasok s jedným tŕňom; Zúžený opasok; Opasok na suchý zips; Iné
ja: ウェイトリフティングベルトスタイル: ベンチベルト; ディッピングベルト; ダブルプロングベルト; ハイブリッドベルト; レバーベルト; パワーリフティングベルト; クイックロックベルト; シングルプロングベルト; テーパードベルト; ベルクロベルト; その他
hu: Súlyemelő öv stílusa: Fekvenyomó öv; Tolódzkodó öv; Dupla csatos öv; Hibrid öv; Emelőkaros öv; Erőemelő öv; Gyorszáras öv; Szimpla csatos öv; Elkeskenyedő öv; Tépőzáras öv; Egyéb
da: Stil for vægtløftningsbælte: Bænkpresbælte; Dip-bælte; Bælte med dobbeltspænde; Hybridbælte; Lever-bælte; Styrkeløftsbælte; Bælte med hurtiglås; Bælte med enkeltspænde; Tilspidset bælte; Velcrobælte; Andet